sl-SI: Osnova za merjenje velikosti ščitnika: Obseg bicepsa/nadlakti; Obseg komolca; Obseg podlakti; Več meritev; Ena velikost/prilagodljivo; Obseg zapestja; Drugo
tr: Koruyucu beden ölçüsünün dayandığı ölçüm esası: Pazı/üst kol çevresi; Dirsek çevresi; Ön kol çevresi; Birden fazla ölçüm; Tek beden / ayarlanabilir; Bilek çevresi; Diğer
nb: Målegrunnlag for vaktstørrelse: Omkrets for biceps / overarm; Omkrets for albue; Omkrets for underarm; Flere mål; Én størrelse / justerbar; Omkrets for håndledd; Annet
hr-HR: Osnova mjerenja veličine straže: Opseg bicepsa/nadlaktice; Opseg lakta; Opseg podlaktice; Višestruke mjere; Univerzalna veličina / podesivo; Opseg zapešća; Ostalo
zh-TW: 護具尺寸測量依據: 二頭肌/上臂圍; 手肘圍; 前臂圍; 多重測量; 單一尺寸/可調式; 手腕圍; 其他
th: หลักเกณฑ์การวัดขนาดการ์ด: เส้นรอบวงลูกหนู/ต้นแขน; เส้นรอบวงข้อศอก; เส้นรอบวงปลายแขน; การวัดหลายจุด; ขนาดเดียว / ปรับได้; เส้นรอบวงข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Основа за измерване на размера на предпазителя: Обиколка на бицепса/горната част на ръката; Обиколка на лакътя; Обиколка на предмишницата; Множество измервания; Един размер / регулируем; Обиколка на китката; Други
it: Base di misurazione della taglia della guardia: Circonferenza bicipite/parte superiore del braccio; Circonferenza gomito; Circonferenza avambraccio; Misure multiple; Taglia unica / regolabile; Circonferenza polso; Altro
ru: Основа измерения размера защиты: Обхват бицепса/плеча; Обхват локтя; Обхват предплечья; Несколько измерений; Один размер / регулируемый; Обхват запястья; Другое
nl: Beschermer maat meetbasis: Omtrek biceps/bovenarm; Omtrek elleboog; Omtrek onderarm; Meerdere metingen; One size / verstelbaar; Omtrek pols; Overig
ko: 보호대 크기 측정 기준: 이두근/위팔 둘레; 팔꿈치 둘레; 아래팔 둘레; 다중 측정; 단일 사이즈 / 조절 가능; 손목 둘레; 기타
en: Guard size measurement basis: Bicep/upper arm circumference; Elbow circumference; Forearm circumference; Multiple measurements; One size / adjustable; Wrist circumference; Other
ja: ガードサイズ測定基準: 上腕二頭筋/上腕周囲長; 肘周囲長; 前腕周囲長; 複数の寸法; ワンサイズ/調節可能; 手首周囲長; その他
fr: Mesure de référence pour la taille de la protection: Circonférence du biceps/haut du bras; Circonférence du coude; Circonférence de l’avant-bras; Plusieurs mesures; Taille unique / réglable; Circonférence du poignet; Autre
pl: Podstawa pomiaru rozmiaru ochraniacza: Obwód bicepsa / ramienia; Obwód łokcia; Obwód przedramienia; Wiele pomiarów; Rozmiar uniwersalny / regulowany; Obwód nadgarstka; Inne
lt-LT: Apsaugos dydžio matavimo pagrindas: Bicepso / žasto apimtis; Alkūnės apimtis; Dilbio apimtis; Keli matavimai; Vieno dydžio / reguliuojamas; Riešo apimtis; Kita
vi: Cơ sở đo kích thước bảo vệ: Chu vi bắp tay/phần cánh tay trên; Chu vi khuỷu tay; Chu vi cẳng tay; Đo lường đa điểm; Một cỡ/có thể điều chỉnh; Chu vi cổ tay; Khác
cs: Základ měření velikosti chrániče: Obvod bicepsu / horní části paže; Obvod lokte; Obvod předloktí; Více rozměrů; Jedna velikost / nastavitelné; Obvod zápěstí; Ostatní
el: Βάση μέτρησης μεγέθους προστατευτικού: Περίμετρος δικεφάλου/άνω βραχίονα; Περίμετρος αγκώνα; Περίμετρος αντιβραχίου; Πολλαπλές μετρήσεις; Ένα μέγεθος / ρυθμιζόμενο; Περίμετρος καρπού; Άλλο
sv: Mätgrund för skyddsstorlek: Biceps-/överarmsomkrets; Armbågsomkrets; Underarmsomkrets; Flera mått; En storlek/justerbar; Handledsomkrets; Övrigt
zh-CN: 防护具尺寸测量基准: 二头肌/上臂围度; 肘部围度; 前臂围度; 多项测量; 均码/可调节; 手腕围度; 其他
hu: A védőburkolat méretének meghatározási alapja: Bicepsz/felkar kerülete; Könyök kerülete; Alkar kerülete; Többszörös mérés; Egyméretes / állítható; Csukló kerülete; Egyéb
fi: Suojuksen koon mittausperuste: Hauiksen / olkavarren ympärys; Kyynärpään ympärys; Kyynärvarren ympärys; Useita mittoja; Yksi koko / säädettävä; Ranteen ympärys; Muu
pt-BR: Proteção base de medição do tamanho: Circunferência do bíceps/braço; Circunferência do cotovelo; Circunferência do antebraço; Múltiplas medidas; Tamanho único / ajustável; Circunferência do pulso; Outra
ro-RO: Baza de măsurare a dimensiunii protecției: Circumferința bicepsului/brațului superior; Circumferința cotului; Circumferința antebrațului; Măsurători multiple; Mărime universală / reglabilă; Circumferința încheieturii mâinii; Altele
es: Base de medición de talla de protección: Circunferencia de bíceps/brazo superior; Circunferencia del codo; Circunferencia del antebrazo; Múltiples medidas; Talla única/ajustable; Circunferencia de la muñeca; Otro
de: Messgrundlage für die Schutzgröße: Bizeps-/Oberarmumfang; Ellenbogenumfang; Unterarmumfang; Mehrere Maße; Einheitsgröße/Anpassbar; Handgelenkumfang; Sonstige
sk-SK: Základ pre meranie veľkosti chrániča: Obvod bicepsu/ramena; Obvod lakťa; Obvod predlaktia; Viacero meraní; Jedna veľkosť/nastaviteľná; Obvod zápästia; Iné
pt-PT: Base de medição do tamanho da proteção: Perímetro do bíceps/parte superior do braço; Perímetro do cotovelo; Perímetro do antebraço; Várias medições; Tamanho único/ajustável; Perímetro do pulso; Outra
da: Målgrundlag for beskyttelsesstørrelse: Biceps-/overarmsomkreds; Albuens omkreds; Underarmsomkreds; Flere målinger; One size/justerbar; Håndledsomkreds; Andet